North Dakota, session 69, HB1152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 12 of section 57-02-01 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
12. "Residential property" means all property, or portions of property, used by an individual
or group of individuals as a dwelling, including property upon which a mobile home is
located but not including hotel and motel accommodations required to be licensed
under chapter 23-09 nor, structures providing living accommodations for four or more
separate family units nor, or any tract of land upon which four or more mobile homes
are located. The term includes garages, barns, and storage buildings not located on
the same parcel as a dwelling, used in connection with residential use, and not used
for commercial or agricultural purposes.
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2024.
Page No. 1 25.0311.01000